dicts/armenian_western_2.dic
ականազերծել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
աղտոտուել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
Ամասիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
այդժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
այլաբանել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
այսօր/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
այրիացնել/VAVTVEDEABG2IN
անառակատուն/DEGDABINPM
անարուեստութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
Անդորրա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
անդրադարձնէ/CHGU
անդրադարձնէիր/CHGU
անդրադարձուէր/CHGU
անդրադարձուէք/CHGU
անդրադարձուին/CHGU
անդրոշմ/DEABGEINPP
անզգայանալ/VAVTVCDEABG2IN
անթեմ/DEABGEINPP
անթոլոգիայ/DEABGEINPH
անհաստատամտութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
անհաստատութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
անուանադրում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
անուանակոչել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
անուշահամութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
անպայթելի/DEABGEINPP
անպայթուցիկ/DEABGEINPP
անվերջութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
աշխատաժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
աչք/DEABGEINPM
ապաժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
ապախոշորացուել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
ապակի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
ապաքինիլ/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
Ապպիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
առակաբանել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
առիւծամայր/DEG7PM
առնելիք/DEABGEINPP
ասած/CHDEABGEINPP
ասացի/CH
ասել/CHDEVAABG2IN
ասեղել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
ասուեմ/CHGU
ասուէի/CHGU
ասուէիք/CHGU
Արա/DEABGEINPPPZ
Արամ/DEABGEINPPPZ
արարողութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
արբեցութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
արգենտինահայ/DYABG2INPM
արեց/CH
արեւաձուկ/DEGDPM
արեւմտահայ/DYABG2INPM
արծաթաջրում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
արմատահանուել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
Արմաւիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
արտաժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
արքայամայր/DEG7PM
աւատատէր/DEPMG8
Աֆրիկա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
բազմասերունդ/DEPPABGEINABGEIN
բազմօրեայ/DEABGEINPH
բաժանարար/DEABGEINPP
բաժանելի/DEABGEINPP
բաժանելիութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
բամբակենի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
բայ/DYABGEINPM
բանավէճ/DEABGEINPM
բառաժայթքում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
բարերարուհի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
Բերիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
բոստանատէր/DEPMG8
բորոտիլ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
գազանակերպութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
գազափոխանակութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
գաղթահայ/DYABG2INPM
գայիք/CH
գանգաչափում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
գառն/DEGDABINPM
գեղուհի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
գերագնահատում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
գերատեսչականութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
գերմանահայ/DYABG2INPM
գերտաքացնել/VAVUVEDEABG2IN
գէստապոյ/DEABGEINPH
գինետուն/DEGDABINPM
գիր/DEABGEINPM
գիրացնել/VAVUVEDEABG2IN
գիւղատէր/DEPMG8
գլխաքարշ/DEABGEIN
գլխիբաց/DEABGEINPP
գոմշատէր/DEPMG8
գրչեղբայր/DEG7PP
Դաղմատիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
դաշնակահարել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
դատ/DEABGEINPM
դատուիմ/CHGU
դարձայ/CH
դարձնէինք/CHGU
դարձուես/CHGU
դարձուեցանք/CH
դարձուէք/CHGU
դարձուցիր/CH
Դաւիթ/DEABGEINPPPZ
դիցական/DEABGEINPP
դիւրախաբութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
դիւրամարսութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
դոմինօ/DEABGEINPH
դուստր/DEG7ABINPM
դրամատուն/DEGDABINPM
դրդել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
դրիք/CH
դրօշազարդուիլ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
եգիպտահայ/DYABG2INPM
եգիպտացի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
եզատէր/DEPMG8
ելուզուել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
եղնջամայր/DEG7PM
եռասայր/DEABGEINPM
ետամառ/DEINAAGAPP
երանք/DEABGEINPP
երեսունհինգերորդական/DEABGEINPP
երեսունմէկանոց/DEABGEINPP
երեքժանի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
երեքշաբթի/DEGCACINPP
երիզապատում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
երիզաւորում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
երկուշաբթի/DEGCACINPP
երկրացի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
երջանկացուիլ/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
Եւրասիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
եօթնակնեայ/DEABGEINPH
զանգուած/CHDEABGEINPP
զինապատեան/DEABGEINPP
զոհուիլ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
էջատել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
էսօր/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
էր/CH
ընկեր/DEABGEING8PP
ընտելանալ/VAVTVCDEABG2IN
ըսիր/CH
թարշամ/DEABGEINPP
թեորիայ/DEABGEINPH
թերասածութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
թթաբուծութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
թոռնադուստր/DEG7ABINPM
թունաբանութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
թուրքահայ/DYABG2INPM
թուրքմենուհի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
թռչկոտում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
թռչնաձեւ/DEABGEINPM
թրաշում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
թրջուած/CHDEABGEINPP
թօզոտուել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
թօթափիլ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
ժպտացնել/VAVUVEDEABG2IN
ինդուստրիայ/DEA4G4I4L4PP
իննսունական/DEABGEINPP
իջեցնեմ/CHGU
իջեւանատուն/DEGDABINPM
իջնել/VAVTVDDEABG2IN
իտալահայ/DYABG2INPM
իրանահայ/DYABG2INPM
իրիկնաժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
լալկել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
լայի/CH
լեռնահորատում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
լիբանանահայ/DYABG2INPM
լուլայ/DEABGEINPH
լուսնաժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
խաղընկեր/DEABGEING8PP
խաղողենի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
խաչեղբայր/DEG7PP
խմբապետութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
խնդրառութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
խնդրել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
խնկածխութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
խնկահոտ/DEABGEINPM
խոլուել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
խոհուն/DEABGEINPP
խորթացնել/VAVUVEDEABG2IN
խորիզ/DEABGEINPP
խորշոմապատել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
խրոխտապանծ/DEABGEINPP
խրոխտացում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
խրոխտում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
կաթնախպէր/DEG7PP
կաթոլիկահայ/DYABG2INPM
կաթուածահարել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
կաթսայատուն/DEGDABINPM
Կալիֆորնիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
կանաչեցնել/VAVUVEDEABG2IN
կապտագունել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
կապտացում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
կարճավարս/DEABGEINPM
կարմրահատ/DEABGEINPM
կարմրոտանի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
կաւճեայ/DEABGEINPH
կերակուր/DEABGEINPP
կէսօր/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
կինօձեռնարկատէր/DEPMG8
կիսահեգնոտ/DEABGEIN
կիսահեղուկ/DEABGEINPP
կիրակի/DEGCACINPP
կնքալուծում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
կնքահայր/DEG7PM
կնքում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
կողմնապաշտութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
կոյ/DYABGEINPM
կոնուենցիայ/DEA4G4I4L4PP
կոնսոլիդացուել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
կործանարարութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
կուլմինացիայ/DEABGEINPH
կռթամայր/DEG7PM
կրծոտուիլ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
կրպակավաճառ/DEABGEINPP
հակառակիլ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
համակերպուող/CHDEABGEINPP
համակողմանի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
հանգստաժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
հասկաքաղել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
հաստամաշկ/DEABGEINPM
հարիւրբերնանի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
հարսանքատէր/DEPMG8
հարսնազգեստ/DEABGEINPP
հարսնական/DEABGEINPP
հեշտաւէտութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
հեռագրատուն/DEGDABINPM
հեռագրում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
հեռազգացում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
հեռաձգութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
հեռացում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
հետեւողականութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
հերոսամայր/DEG7PM
հինգշաբթի/DEGCACINPP
հնգամսեայ/DEABGEINPH
հոլանդուհի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
հողաւորել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
հրամցուիլ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
հօրեղբօրակին/DEG8PP
ձմեռ/DEINAAGAPP
ձուլամայր/DEG7PM
ճանկ/DEABGEINPM
ճգնաւորուհի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
ճկաթոռ/DEABGEINPP
ճմրթուած/CHDEABGEINPP
Մալաթիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
մակագիր/DEABGEINPP
մակագրութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
մահաժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
մահտարաժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
մարմնեղութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
մեծազարմութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
մեծատուն/DEGDABINPM
մեղքնալ/VAVTVCDEABG2IN
մեռելատէր/DEPMG8
մետաղամշակում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
մետաղապատում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
մետաղեայ/DEABGEINPH
մեքենագրուհի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
մթնագիշեր/DEAAGAINPPGEAB
միազմ/DEABGEINPP
միջնորդել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
մռայլասիրտ/DEABGEINPM
մռմռացնել/VAVUVEDEABG2IN
յայնժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
յարդագոյն/DEABGEINPP
յունասիրութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
յունիսեան/DEABGEINPP
նաւթահորատէր/DEPMG8
նաւթուղի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
ներազդեցութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
ներկապատուել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
նմանաբուժութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
նմանահանել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
Նոյ/DYABGEIN
նոյնացում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
նոտագրում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
նոտայ/DEABGEPHIN
նուագակցում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
շաբթ/DEAAGA00
շիղաձուկ/DEGDPM
շողակնափայլ/DEABGEINPM
շուտ/AAGAIN
ոճաբանել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
ոճաբանում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
ոսկեկազմ/DEABGEINPM
ոսկեպատուել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
որոշութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
որով/DEABGEIN
ութապատկել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
ուստր/DEG7ABINPM
ուրախակցել/VAVTVBDEABG2IN
չափակցութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
Չեխոսլովակիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
չորեքշաբթի/DEGCACINPP
չրթչրթալ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
պահունակութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
պաղեցում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
պաղլեղում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
պարեկատուն/DEGDABINPM
պարսամայր/DEG7PM
պարտիզատէր/DEPMG8
պոլսահայ/DYABG2INPM
պոչականութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
պչրուհի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
ջահակալ/DEABGEINPP
ջերմոգի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
ջերմոտել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
ռադիօֆիզիկայ/DEABGEINPH
ռանդուել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
Ռումինիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
սալաթ/DEABGEINPP
սառաւ/CH
սառցալեռ/DEGDABINPP
Սարօ/DEA4G4I4L4PPPZ
սգուորութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
սերմել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
սեւագիշեր/DEAAGAINPPGEAB
սթափեցում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
սթափում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
սիրահարուածութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
սիւնազարդուել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
սիւնակերպ/DEABGEINPM
սպիտակատուտ/DEABGEINPP
սրճարանատէր/DEPMG8
սրտագդալային/DEABGEINPP
սրտագոչ/DEABGEIN
սփիւռքահայ/DYABG2INPM
վահրոտել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
վաղ/AAGAINDE
Վարդան/DEABGEINPZ
վարժատուն/DEGDABINPM
Վարշաւա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
վերադարձնեմ/CHGU
վերադարձնէիր/CHGU
վերադարձուին/CHGU
վնասահատուցում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
վնասում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
վշտակցութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
տամ/CH
տապկնոցի/DEABG2I2PPGEIN
տառամայր/DEG7PM
տառեղ/DEABGEINPP
տասնվեցամեայ/DEABGEINPH
տարաձայն/DEABGEINPM
տարի/DEAAGAINPPGEAB
տափել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
տեղայնութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
տեւել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
տղամարդկային/DEABGEINPP
տղայասպանութիւն/DEABG1I1INPP
տնատէր/DEPMG8
ցայնժամ/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
ցաւակցիլ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
ցաւամոքիչ/DEABGEINPP
ցուցանշել/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
փռթկալ/VAVUVBDEABG2IN
փռնատուն/DEGDABINPM
քնքշակազմ/DEABGEINPM
քրտնաթորում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
քրտնահարում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
օճառանալ/VAVTVCDEABG2IN
օր/DEAAGAINPMGEAB
ֆրակցիայ/DEABGEINPH
